Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 6. Contested Cases
§ 27-14-602.
Contested cases generally.

A hearing examiner designated by the office of administrative hearings created by W.S.

9-2-2201

shall conduct contested cases under this act in accordance with this section.

Upon receipt of a request for hearing from the division as provided in W.S. 27-14-601(k)(v), the case shall be determined by a hearing examiner in accordance with the law in effect at the time of the injury as a small claims hearing or as a contested case hearing subject to the following:

A request for hearing shall be conducted as a small claims hearing if the amount at issue is less than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), is not an issue of the compensability of the injury pursuant to W.S. 27-14-601(a) and the division requests the hearing be held as a small claims hearing. The division shall provide notice that it seeks a small claims hearing under this paragraph in the notice of request for hearing filed pursuant to W.S. 27-14-601(k)(v). If the division provides such notice, the hearing shall be a small claims hearing unless a party to the hearing objects within fifteen (15) days from the date of the notice of request, in which case the hearing officer shall review the file and determine if a small claims hearing is appropriate or if a contested case hearing is necessary or appropriate. Each party to the hearing may within thirty (30) days from the date of notice of request, submit to the hearing examiner any written evidence and argument on the issue. The hearing officer may require either party to provide such documents, filings and evidence as the hearing officer deems relevant to the issue. Copies of the material submitted to the hearing examiner shall be mailed or delivered to all opposing parties. In addition, each party may submit rebuttal evidence and argument to the hearing examiner within forty-five (45) days following the date of notice of request for hearing. Upon request of any party to the hearing and at the discretion of the hearing officer, any proceeding under this paragraph may be conducted in person or by telephone. The hearing examiner shall review the case and written submissions and render a written decision not more than seventy-five (75) days following referral of the request for hearing. No attorney fees or other costs shall be allowed by the hearing examiner on behalf of or for any party to a hearing under this paragraph. In addition, the attorney general’s office shall not represent or directly assist the division in the preparation for a hearing under this paragraph;

All other requests for hearing not specified under paragraph (b)(i) of this section shall be conducted as a contested case in accordance with procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure as applicable under rules of the office of administrative hearings. The hearing examiner designated by the office of administrative hearings shall render a decision in a contested case within thirty (30) days after the close of the record. If the contested case is heard by the hearing panel created pursuant to W.S. 27-14-616(b)(iv), the panel shall render a decision within forty-five (45) days after the close of the record;

Appeals may be taken from the decision rendered in any small claims hearing or contested case hearing by any affected party to the district court as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Hearings under this section shall be held at a location mutually convenient to the parties, as determined by the hearing officer. If the injury occurs at a location outside Wyoming, the hearing shall be held in the county in which the employer’s principal place of business is located, unless the hearing officer determines a different location is more convenient to the parties;

Any hearing conducted pursuant to this section involving multiple sites may be conducted through audio or video conferencing at the discretion of the hearing officer or hearing panel.

All written reports, claims and other documents filed with the division shall be considered as pleadings in the case. The attorney general’s office shall represent the division in all contested cases. The hearing examiner has exclusive jurisdiction to make the final administrative determination of the validity and amount of compensation payable under this act. Except as otherwise specified in this subsection, all court costs shall be paid from the worker’s compensation account if the judgment is in favor of the employer or the division. If judgment is against the employer and the employer contested the claim without being joined in the contest by the division, the court costs shall be paid by the employer. When the employer or division prevails, the court costs shall not affect the employer’s experience rating. If judgment is against a health care provider, the court costs shall be paid by the health care provider.

Upon request, the hearing examiner may appoint an attorney to represent the employee or claimants and may allow the appointed attorney a reasonable fee for his services at the conclusion of the proceeding. An appointed attorney shall be paid according to the order of the hearing examiner either from the worker’s compensation account, from amounts awarded to the employee or claimants or from the employer. In any contested case where the issue is the compensability of an injury, a prevailing employer’s attorney fees shall also be paid according to the order of the hearing examiner from the worker’s compensation account, not to affect the employer’s experience rating. An award of attorney’s fees shall be for a reasonable number of hours and shall not exceed the benefits at issue in the contested case hearing. In all other cases if the employer or division prevails, the attorney’s fees allowed an employee’s attorney shall not affect the employer’s experience rating. Attorney fees allowed shall be at an hourly rate established by the director of the office of administrative hearings and any application for attorney’s fees shall be supported by a verified itemization of all services provided. No fee shall be awarded in any case in which the hearing examiner determines the claim or objection to be frivolous and without legal or factual justification. If the division or a hearing examiner determines that an injured worker’s failure to meet any procedural deadline in this act is through the fault of the worker’s attorney, the division shall reconsider its determination or a hearing examiner shall order the contested case returned to the division for redetermination of the contested issues as provided in W.S. 27-14-601(k).

Except as otherwise provided within this subsection, all documents filed with the division under subsection (c) of this section may be maintained by the division on computer and the hearing examiner or court may admit into evidence any documents resident in the computer imaging file. If a genuine issue as to the authenticity of the document is raised by a party, by a hearing examiner or by the court, the hearing examiner or court may, before admitting the document into evidence, require the division to certify that the record is a true and correct copy or transcript of records on file in the division.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 264, § 2; 1990, ch. 88, § 1; 1992, ch. 30, § 2; 1993, ch. 32, § 1; 1994, ch. 86, § 2; 1995, ch. 193, § 1; 1996, ch. 82, § 1; 1997, ch. 177, § 1; 1998, ch. 117, § 1; 2009, ch. 156, § 1.

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, see the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (d), added the last sentence.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Jurisdiction. —

Employee’s workers’ compensation request for judicial review was dismissed because, (1) statutorily, only district courts in the counties where the administrative action was taken or the employee resided had jurisdiction, (2) the failure of the Wyoming Workers’ Compensation Division (Division) to appeal the denial of a motion to dismiss did not waive jurisdiction, and (3) the statute did not merely specify venue. McCallister v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2019 WY 47, 440 P.3d 1078,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 4

7

(Wyo. 2019); Pier v. State, 2019 WY 3, 432 P.3d 890,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2019).

Division of workers' safety and compensation had authority to form internal hearing unit,

and division was authorized to promulgate rules and regulations relating to resolution of contested matters not required to be heard by medical commission or office of administrative hearings, including agency review of claimed late filings. Van Gundy v. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., Dep't of Empl., 964 P.2d 1268,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1998).

Claim and reports in compensation cases take the place of pleadings.

Black Watch Farms v. Baldwin, 474 P.2d 297,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 1970).

The procedural requirements of § 27-14-404(d)

do not apply during the pendency of a contested case, and the hearing examiner may properly award retroactive temporary total disability benefits if the claimant prevails on the merits. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Gerdes, 951 P.2d 1170,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1997).

Exhaustion of administrative remedies. —

Only after plaintiff had pursued the contested case hearing would he have exhausted his administrative remedies and be entitled to judicial review in the state district court. Routh v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 952 P.2d 1108,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. Feb. 17, 1998), cert. denied, 525 U.S. 814, 119 S. Ct. 49, 142 L. Ed. 2d 38, 1998 U.S. LEXIS 4815 (U.S. 1998).

And they should be liberally construed.

Black Watch Farms v. Baldwin, 474 P.2d 297,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 1970).

Summary judgment may be utilized. —

In light of the 1990 amendment of the statute and the adoption of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure by the Rules for Contested Case Practice, a summary judgment can be utilized in a case before the Office of Administrative Hearings and should be granted when appropriate. Neal v. Caballo Rojo, Inc., 899 P.2d 56,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1995).

Substantive law in effect at time of employee's injury governs employee's receipt of worker's compensation benefits.

Ottema v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 968 P.2d 41,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1998).

Law in effect at time of injury— exception. —

Where subsequent expository legislation clearly announced intent that medical commission hear all medically contested workers' compensation cases regardless of date of injury, this legislation controlled over prior case law and over prior, general legislation contained in subdivision (b) of this section; medical commission therefore had jurisdiction to hear medically contested case involving injury which occurred before commission was established. Pohl v. Bailey Co., 980 P.2d 816,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1999).

Employer is entitled to dispute any award or claim

on the basis that it is unreasonable or improper and certainly can raise the question as to whether the award or claim is causally related to the industrial accident which occurred or whether it may be attributable to some other event. Herring v. Welltech, Inc., 660 P.2d 361,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1983).

The language of this section does not include reports of physicians,

but the important thing about the provision is that the claim of the workman and the statement and report of the employer make up the issues. Hearing is had on them in the sense in which trial is had on pleadings in other cases. Black Watch Farms v. Baldwin, 474 P.2d 297,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 1970).

No prejudice where evidence in unadmitted reports same as informationreceived into evidence. —

In a hearing on an application for additional benefits or modification, the evidence and testimony received were identical to that contained in reports which were in the court file but were not offered or received into evidence, and which were improperly referred to by the court. Thus, the evidence contained in the reports was otherwise properly before the court and no prejudice resulted. In re Jones, 702 P.2d 1299,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 511

(Wyo. 1985).

Hearing after termination of benefits constitutional. —

Notwithstanding the question of whether or not worker's interest in temporary total disability benefits is a property right, this section clearly states that a hearing is available. Procedural due process of law is provided if, upon a hearing after termination of temporary total benefits, retroactive relief may be awarded the worker. Higgins v. State, 739 P.2d 129,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 484 U.S. 988, 108 S. Ct. 508, 98 L. Ed. 2d 507, 1987 U.S. LEXIS 5149 (U.S. 1987).

Claimant's case was properly referred to and adjudicated by hearing officer (now examiner)

where the claim was filed after July 1, 1987, even though the office of independent hearing officers (examiners) was not created until after the claimant's injury had occurred. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Rivera, 796 P.2d 447,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1990).

Hearing examiner acquired jurisdiction of claim. —

The hearing examiner acquired jurisdiction for purposes of initiating the contested case proceedings under his exclusive jurisdiction when the clerk of the district court transmitted the official case file to him even though the Worker's Compensation Division had not made a final determination on the employee's claim. Little Am. Ref. Co. v. Witt, 854 P.2d 51,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1993).

Error where clerk departs from statutory procedure. —

See Herring v. Welltech, Inc., 660 P.2d 361,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1983).

Worker not entitled to reopen case following written settlement stipulation. —

A settlement stipulation, acquiesced to by the district court, although no order was entered expressly approving the stipulation, and the accompanying orders of award were judicial determinations to be accorded finality. The worker was not entitled to reopen the case, as the written stipulation did not violate constitutional and statutory provisions prohibiting contractual devices to relieve an employer from a liability created by the worker's compensation laws. Further, the worker was not entitled to a hearing on his petition to reopen the case, as there was no factual dispute, the petition being subject to dismissal by operation of a legal bar. Herring v. Welltech, Inc., 715 P.2d 553,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 509

(Wyo. 1986).

District court has no authority to afford affirmative relief

in connection with a review of workers' compensation proceedings. Its disposition is limited to the review of authority articulated in the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act (chapter 3 of title 16). State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Hollister, 794 P.2d 886,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1990).

Authority to award attorney's fees. —

Administrative agencies did not have authority to disregard rules establishing how attorneys representing workers' compensation claimants would be compensated, and thus neither agencies nor court could grant attorney's request for a fee greater than that set by rules. Goedert ex rel. Wolfe v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 991 P.2d 1225,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1999).

Award of attorneys' fees requires appointment of attorney. —

Hearing examiner did not have power or discretion to award attorneys' fees to one not appropriately appointed as petitioner's attorney. Whiteman v. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 984 P.2d 1079,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1999).

Causation and attorney's fees. —

Subsection (d) nowhere mentions the word “causation” nor does it provide an exception based on causation; therefore, the subsection applied notwithstanding a determination that the workers' safety and compensation division had raised causation as an issue. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. v. Gerrard, 2001 WY 7, 17 P.3d 20,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2001).

Amount of attorney's fee. —

An award of attorney's fees to the claimant was proper, notwithstanding that it was greater than the amount at issue, where the workers' safety and compensation division conceded that the fee was reasonable and the attorney's participation and the resulting stipulated dismissal meant that the considerable expense of a full contested case hearing was avoided. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. v. Gerrard, 2001 WY 7, 17 P.3d 20,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2001).

Award of attorney fees not limited to “benefits at issue.” —

The Office of Administrative Hearings (OAH) properly awarded attorney fees to a workers' compensation claimant's appointed attorney in the claimants appeal of a denial of benefits. Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-602(d) does not limit the award of an employee's attorney fees to the ‘benefits at issue’ and there was sufficient evidence in the record to support the determination of the hearing examiner on reasonableness under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-14-126(b)(i). OAH. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Smith, 2005 WY 137, 121 P.3d 150,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(2005).

Hearing on motion for attorneys' fees. —

Failure to hold hearing before denying motion for award of attorneys' fees was not improper and did not violate petitioner's due process rights. Whiteman v. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 984 P.2d 1079,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1999).

Amount awarded for attorney's compensation modifiable. —

The district court could hear an appeal from a hearing examiner's order reducing the compensation of an attorney for a worker's compensation claimant, and could modify the order, where the court found the amount awarded was unreasonable and the hearing examiner provided no factual or legal basis to justify the fee reduction. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Brown, 805 P.2d 830,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1991).

Accrual of right to legal representation. —

This section is silent as to when an employee's right to paid legal representation accrues. Painter v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 931 P.2d 953,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1997), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

An employee is entitled to paid legal representation when the workers' compensation division issues a final determination regarding the compensability of an injury, whether or not a formal request for a contested case is filed. Painter v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 931 P.2d 953,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1997), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

The fact that a compensation claimant's right to paid legal representation accrues when the workers' compensation division issues a final determination does not require the hearing examiner to award attorney fees to the claimant's attorney; that determination is made on a case-by-case basis pursuant to the statutory standards. Painter v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 931 P.2d 953,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1997), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

Olsten Temporary Servs. v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 870 P.2d 360,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1994); Manning v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Comp. Div., 938 P.2d 870,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

In re Claim of Taffner, 821 P.2d 103,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1991); Tenorio v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 931 P.2d 234,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1997); State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Jackson, 994 P.2d 320,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1999); Serda v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 38, 42 P.3d 466,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2002); State ex rel. Wyo. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2016 WY 111, 384 P.3d 267,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2016).

Cited

in

Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Comp. Div., 798 P.2d 323,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1990); State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div. v. Ohnstad, 802 P.2d 865,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1990); Shassetz v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 920 P.2d 1246,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1996); Cargile v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 965 P.2d 666,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1998); Nagle v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim of Nagle), 2008 WY 99, 190 P.3d 159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Aug. 19, 2008).

Stated in

Porter v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2017 WY 69, 396 P.3d 999,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 27-14-603.
Burden of proof; required proof of circumstances; coronary conditions; hernia.

The burden of proof in contested cases involving injuries which occur over a substantial period of time is on the employee to prove by competent medical authority that his claim arose out of and in the course of his employment and to prove by a preponderance of evidence that:

There is a direct causal connection between the condition or circumstances under which the work is performed and the injury;

The injury can be seen to have followed as a natural incident of the work as a result of the employment;

The injury can fairly be traced to the employment as a proximate cause;

The injury does not come from a hazard to which employees would have been equally exposed outside of the employment; and

The injury is incidental to the character of the business and not independent of the relation of employer and employee.

Benefits for employment-related coronary conditions except those directly and solely caused by an injury, are not payable unless the employee establishes by competent medical authority that:

There is a direct causal connection between the condition under which the work was performed and the cardiac condition; and

The causative exertion occurs during the actual period of employment stress clearly unusual to or abnormal for employees in that particular employment, irrespective of whether the employment stress is unusual to or abnormal for the individual employee; and

The acute symptoms of the cardiac condition are clearly manifested not later than four (4) hours after the alleged causative exertion.

If an employee suffers a hernia, he is entitled to compensation if he clearly proves that:

The hernia is of recent origin;

Its appearance was accompanied by pain;

It was immediately preceded by some accidental strain suffered in the course of the employment; and

It did not exist prior to the date of the alleged injury.

If an employee establishes his right to compensation for a hernia as provided and elects not to be operated on, he shall not be compensated for the results of future strangulation of the hernia.

In those proceedings in which the entitlement of an employee to benefits for successive compensable injuries is established but no single employer can be determined to be chargeable for the injuries, the division shall apportion the benefit charge in accordance with W.S. 27-14-201(d).

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1991, ch. 90, § 1; 1994, ch. 86, § 2.

I. General Consideration.

II. Coronary Conditions.

III. Hernia.

§ 27-14-604.
Examination by impartial health care provider; costs; report by nonresident provider.

In any contested proceeding, the hearing examiner may appoint a duly qualified impartial health care provider to examine the employee and give testimony. The fee for the service shall be as ordered by the hearing examiner, with mileage allowance as is allowed to other witnesses to be assessed as costs and paid as other witness fees are paid. The employer or employee may, at his own expense, also designate a qualified health care provider who may be present at the examination of the employee and give testimony at later hearings.

If the employer and employee stipulate to an examination of the employee by a nonresident, qualified health care provider designated by the hearing examiner, and that the report of the health care provider as to his examination shall be admitted in evidence, the hearing examiner may order payment of the reasonable cost and expense of the employee’s attendance upon the health care provider, the provider’s fee for examination of the employee and his report thereon. The fees and costs shall be charged in the same manner as other costs and witness fees. The nonresident health care provider shall report in writing to the hearing examiner and include answers to questions asked by the hearing examiner relative to the employee’s condition.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Liberal application. —

Provision authorizing court to appoint physician to examine employee on employer's application should be liberally applied because contest affects not merely immediate parties thereto but often state compensation fund as a whole. In re Iles, 56 Wyo. 443, 110 P.2d 826,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1941).

When medical knowledge essential. —

In a compensation case where the real crucial question was whether pain in claimant's back was due to his use of a “pry” stick in loading heavy equipment, the task to which he had been assigned, or was due to a congenital defect, which produced an abnormal body posture, medical scientific knowledge was essential to a correct solution of the problem. Ludlow v. Wortham Mach. Co., 71 Wyo. 331, 257 P.2d 358,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1953).

Discretion of court. —

Where employer's attorney did not ask for appointment of impartial physician in compensation proceeding to examine employee but asked for examination by physician who had previously declared employee was malingerer, trial court did not abuse its discretion in refusing application. In re Iles, 56 Wyo. 443, 110 P.2d 826,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1941).

Quoted

in

Serda v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 38, 42 P.3d 466,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2002).

Stated

in

Payne v. Frontier Refining, Inc., 993 P.2d 313,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1999).

Cited

in

Mattis v. Husky RMP Properties, Inc., 790 P.2d 1279,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1990).